California, session 20252026, AB1508.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 59 of the Military and Veterans Code is amended to read:59. (a) There is in the state government a Governor’s Military Council (council) that shall serve under the direction of the Military Department and consist of members appointed by the Governor. The council shall advise the Governor on efforts to retain military installations and operations within the state that are necessary for the defense of the nation, and to coordinate and focus those efforts.(b) The council shall include, but not be limited to, bipartisan representatives from the Senate and Assembly. Senate representatives shall be nominated by the Senate Committee on Rules, and Assembly representatives shall be nominated by the Speaker of the Assembly.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2031, deletes or extends that date.